Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2202.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Department of health services; appropriations; grant; dementia care telementoring program; annual report; delayed repeal A. The sum of $300,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028 and 2028-2029 to the department of health services to provide a grant to implement a dementia care telementoring program to disseminate information regarding dementia care and best practices to health care providers statewide. B. The department of health services shall provide a grant with the monies appropriated pursuant to subsection A of this section to an organization located in this state that demonstrates all of the following: 1. Experience operating telementoring programs. 2. Expertise in neurology and best practices in dementia detection, diagnosis and care management. 3. Capacity to deliver services statewide. C. The dementia care telementoring program shall provide a virtual connection for health care providers and content experts and include didactics, case studies and an emphasis on practice transformation and systems-level issues that affect care delivery. The program shall serve communities in this state and shall prioritize improving health care provider education within this state's rural and underserved communities.  The department of health services shall ensure that the telementoring program is evidence-based and reflects current best practices in dementia detection, diagnosis and care management. D. The organization that receives the grant pursuant to subsection B of this section shall do all of the following: 1. Develop and implement an outreach and recruitment plan to promote participation and retention in the telementoring program. 2. Provide virtual, case-based telementoring sessions for health care providers. 3. Offer continuing medical education or continuing education unit credits. 4. Collect and report participation and outcomes data to the department. E. The department of health services shall annually publish a summary report on the department's public website. F. This section is repealed from and after December 31, 2029.